tools/hyphenators/sma_hyph.tex
årte1
åru1
åruf1
år1ø
å2s2
1ås.
å1s2a1
åsan1
1åse
åse1n
åsha1
1åsi
åsij1
åsj1
ås1l
åsma1
åssa1
1åssj
åst1
åsta1
åsto1
åsva1
1åsvo
1åsvæ
åså1
å1š
2åt2
1åt.
åt1a
å1te
åte1n
åtf1
åt1i1
1åtj1
1åtm
1åts1
åtte1
å2tå
åv1
å1va
å1ve
åvh1
1åvht
åvi1
åvka1
1åvla1
1åvli
åvme1
åvr1i
1åvt
åvve1
åvær1
åvår1
1å1w
2å2å
åå1g
ååme1
ååm1s
åån1
åård1
åår1n
ååte1
ååve1
'an1
'arc1
'2b
'd2
'2e
'2h
'ha1
'ham1
'2i
'j2
'2m
'or1
'2s2
'1ö
1'2å
`j2
`2s2
´j2
´2l
´las1
´2s2
1°c
1°f
